ukrainian/test2.aff
SFX z ию ивалися .
SFX z клися чуться .
SFX z ктися чуться .
SFX z нало раємо .
SFX z кціям ктивній .
SFX z б бовому .
SFX z ацької ачками .
SFX z іте ом .
SFX z нувате ні .
SFX z клись чімось .
SFX z клося чімося .
SFX z ктись чемося .
SFX z ажу увало .
SFX z нься ненім .
SFX z хло хнув .
SFX z еля ися .
SFX z гшись гались .
SFX z мало мувавши .
SFX z мії мному .
SFX z мець мці .
SFX z руся рете .
SFX z вися вленій .
SFX z вись влених .
SFX z сіньких м .
SFX z еняті ками .
SFX z річчя літті .
SFX z лія льнім .
SFX z зете зли .
SFX z шуть сану .
SFX z альня атимем .
SFX z рню рські .
SFX z шуться шімось .
SFX z шеться шіться .
SFX z яте яла .
SFX z тете туть .
SFX z ддям дну .
SFX z щало стивши .
SFX z шеш сано .
SFX z мія мами .
SFX z утимемо емо .
SFX z єнням їлась .
SFX z єння їлось .
SFX z гся гався .
SFX z бете буть .
SFX z сло снули .
SFX z лостям лим .
SFX z вемо ву .
SFX z еням овою .
SFX z ік оки .
SFX z учу атимемо .
SFX z рістю ра .
SFX z тню ти .
SFX z сете суть .
SFX z зіть зете .
SFX z ртися рлася .
SFX z ртись рлося .
SFX z рлися ршись .
SFX z 'ю ність .
SFX z сії сивному .
SFX z оте атиме .
